GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/XMORPH/flex-verb.lexc
LEXICON V.saugen
  saugen+Verb:saugen		vflex/PresReg;
  saugen+Verb:sog		vflex/PastIndStr;
  saugen+Verb:sög		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  saugen+Verb:sogen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schaffen
  schaffen+Verb:schaffen	vflex/PresReg;
  schaffen+Verb:schuf		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schaffen+Verb:schüf		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schaffen+Verb:schaffen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schallen
  schallen+Verb			V_reg ;
  schallen+Verb:scholl		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schallen+Verb:schöll		vflex/PastKonjStr;

LEXICON V.scheiden
  scheiden+Verb:scheiden	vflex/PresReg;
  scheiden+Verb:schied		vflex/PastStr;
  scheiden+Verb:schieden	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.scheinen
  scheinen+Verb:scheinen	vflex/PresReg;
  scheinen+Verb:schien		vflex/PastStr;
  scheinen+Verb:schienen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.scheißen
  scheißen+Verb:scheißen	vflex/PresReg;
  scheißen+Verb:schiss		vflex/PastStr;
  scheißen+Verb:schissen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schelten
  schelten+Verb:schelten	vflex/PresIrreg;
  schelten+Verb:schilt		vflex/Pres2;
  schelten+Verb:schilt		vform/ImpSg;
  schelten+Verb:schalt		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schelten+Verb:schölt		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schelten+Verb:scholten	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.scheren
  scheren+Verb:scheren		vflex/PresReg;
  scheren+Verb:schoren		vform/PPast;
  scheren+Verb:schor		vflex/PastIndStr;
  scheren+Verb:schör		vflex/PastKonjStr;

LEXICON V.schieben
  schieben+Verb:schieben	vflex/PresReg;
  schieben+Verb:schob		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schieben+Verb:schöb		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schieben+Verb:schoben		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schießen
  schießen+Verb:schießen	vflex/PresReg;
  schießen+Verb:schoss		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schießen+Verb:schöss		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schießen+Verb:schossen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schinden
  schinden+Verb:schinden	vflex/PresReg;
  schinden+Verb:schind		vflex/PastIndReg;
  schinden+Verb:schund		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schinden+Verb:schünd		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schinden+Verb:schunden	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schlafen
  schlafen+Verb:schlafen	vflex/PresIrreg;
  schlafen+Verb:schlaf		vflex/ImpSg;
  schlafen+Verb:schläf		vflex/Pres2;
  schlafen+Verb:schlief		vflex/PastStr;
  schlafen+Verb:schlafen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schlagen
  schlagen+Verb:schlagen	vflex/PresIrreg;
  schlagen+Verb:schlag		vflex/ImpSg;
  schlagen+Verb:schläg		vflex/Pres2;
  schlagen+Verb:schlug		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schlagen+Verb:schlüg		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schlagen+Verb:schlagen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schleichen
  schleichen+Verb:schleichen	vflex/PresReg;
  schleichen+Verb:schlich	vflex/PastStr;
  schleichen+Verb:schlichen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schleifen
  schleifen+Verb:schleifen	vflex/PresReg;
  schleifen+Verb:schliff	vflex/PastStr;
  schleifen+Verb:schliffen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schleißen
  schleißen+Verb:schleißen	vflex/PresReg;
  schleißen+Verb:schliss	vflex/PastStr;
  schleißen+Verb:schleiß	vflex/PastReg;
  schleißen+Verb:schlissen	vform/PPast;
  schleißen+Verb:schleißt	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schließen
  schließen+Verb:schließen	vflex/PresReg;
  schließen+Verb:schloss	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schließen+Verb:schlöss	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schließen+Verb:schlossen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schlingen
  schlingen+Verb:schlingen	vflex/PresReg;
  schlingen+Verb:schlang	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schlingen+Verb:schläng	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schlingen+Verb:schlungen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schmeißen
  schmeißen+Verb:schmeißen	vflex/PresReg;
  schmeißen+Verb:schmiss	vflex/PastStr;
  schmeißen+Verb:schmissen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schmelzen
  schmelzen+Verb		V_reg ;	! reg. obsolete
  schmelzen+Verb:schmilz	vflex/Pres2;
  schmelzen+Verb:schmilz	vform/ImpSg;
  schmelzen+Verb:schmolz	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schmelzen+Verb:schmölz	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schmelzen+Verb:schmolzen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schnauben
  schnauben+Verb:schnauben	vflex/PresReg;
  schnauben+Verb:schnob		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schnauben+Verb:schnöb		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schnauben+Verb:schnoben	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schneiden
  schneiden+Verb:schneiden	vflex/PresReg;
  schneiden+Verb:schnitt	vflex/PastStr;
  schneiden+Verb:schnitten	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schrecken
  schrecken+Verb:schrecken	vflex/PresIrreg;
  schrecken+Verb:schrick	vflex/Pres2;
  schrecken+Verb:schrick	vform/ImpSg;
  schrecken+Verb:schrak		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schrecken+Verb:schräk		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schrecken+Verb:schrocken	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schreiben
  schreiben+Verb:schreiben	vflex/PresReg;
  schreiben+Verb:schrieb	vflex/PastStr;
  schreiben+Verb:schrieben	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schreien
  schreien+Verb:schreien	vflex/PresReg;
  schreien+Verb:schrie		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schreien+Verb:schrie^*	vflex/PastKonjStr;	! keine e-Tilgung
  schreien+Verb:schrien		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schreiten
  schreiten+Verb:schreiten	vflex/PresReg;
  schreiten+Verb:schritt	vflex/PastStr;
  schreiten+Verb:schritten	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schweigen
  schweigen+Verb:schweigen	vflex/PresReg;
  schweigen+Verb:schwieg	vflex/PastStr;
  schweigen+Verb:schwiegen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schwellen
  schwellen+Verb:schwellen	vflex/PresIrreg;
  schwellen+Verb:schwill	vflex/Pres2;
  schwellen+Verb:schwill	vform/ImpSg;
  schwellen+Verb:schwoll	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schwellen+Verb:schwöll	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schwellen+Verb:schwollen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schwimmen
  schwimmen+Verb:schwimmen	vflex/PresReg;
  schwimmen+Verb:schwamm	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schwimmen+Verb:schwämm	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schwimmen+Verb:schwömm	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schwimmen+Verb:schwommen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schwinden
  schwinden+Verb:schwinden	vflex/PresReg;
  schwinden+Verb:schwand	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schwinden+Verb:schwänd	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schwinden+Verb:schwunden	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schwingen
  schwingen+Verb:schwingen	vflex/PresReg;
  schwingen+Verb:schwang	vflex/PastIndStr;
  schwingen+Verb:schwäng	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schwingen+Verb:schwungen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.schwören
  schwören+Verb:schwören	vflex/PresReg;
  schwören+Verb:schwor		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schwören+Verb:schwur		vflex/PastIndStr;
  schwören+Verb:schwür		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  schwören+Verb:schworen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sehen
  sehen+Verb:sehen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  sehen+Verb:sieh		vflex/Pres2;
  sehen+Verb:sieh		vflex/ImpSg;		! sieh! siehe!
  sehen+Verb:sah		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sehen+Verb:säh		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sehen+Verb:sehen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.senden
  senden+Verb			V_reg ;
  senden+Verb:sand^*		vflex/PastReg;
  senden+Verb:sandt		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sieden
  sieden+Verb:sieden		V_reg ;
  sieden+Verb:sott		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sieden+Verb:sött		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sieden+Verb:sotten		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.singen
  singen+Verb:singen		vflex/PresReg;
  singen+Verb:sang		vflex/PastIndStr;
  singen+Verb:säng		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  singen+Verb:sungen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sinken
  sinken+Verb:sinken		vflex/PresReg;
  sinken+Verb:sank		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sinken+Verb:sänk		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sinken+Verb:sunken		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sinnen
  sinnen+Verb:sinnen		vflex/PresReg;
  sinnen+Verb:sann		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sinnen+Verb:sänn		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sinnen+Verb:sönn		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sinnen+Verb:sonnen		vform/PPast;
 
LEXICON V.sitzen
  sitzen+Verb:sitzen		vflex/PresReg;
  sitzen+Verb:saß		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sitzen+Verb:säß		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sitzen+Verb:sessen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.speien
  speien+Verb:speien		vflex/PresReg;
  speien+Verb:spie		vflex/PastStr;
  speien+Verb:spieen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.spalten
  spalten+Verb:spalten		vflex/PresReg;
  spalten+Verb:spalt		vflex/PastReg;
  spalten+Verb:spaltet		vform/PPast;
  spalten+Verb:spalten		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.spinnen
  spinnen+Verb:spinnen		vflex/PresReg;
  spinnen+Verb:spann		vflex/PastIndStr;
  spinnen+Verb:spänn		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  spinnen+Verb:spönn		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  spinnen+Verb:sponnen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.spleißen
  spleißen+Verb:spleißen	vflex/PresReg;
  spleißen+Verb:spliss		vflex/PastStr;
  spleißen+Verb:splissen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sprechen
  sprechen+Verb:sprechen	vflex/PresIrreg;
  sprechen+Verb:sprich		vflex/Pres2;
  sprechen+Verb:sprich		vform/ImpSg;
  sprechen+Verb:sprach		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sprechen+Verb:spräch		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sprechen+Verb:sprochen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sprießen
  sprießen+Verb:sprießen	vflex/PresReg;
  sprießen+Verb:spross		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sprießen+Verb:spröss		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sprießen+Verb:sprossen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.springen
  springen+Verb:springen	vflex/PresReg;
  springen+Verb:sprang		vflex/PastIndStr;
  springen+Verb:spräng		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  springen+Verb:sprungen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.stechen
  stechen+Verb:stechen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  stechen+Verb:stich		vflex/Pres2;
  stechen+Verb:stich		vform/ImpSg;
  stechen+Verb:stach		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stechen+Verb:stäch		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stechen+Verb:stochen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.stecken
  stecken+Verb			V_reg ;
  stecken+Verb:stak		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stecken+Verb:stäk		vflex/PastKonjStr;

LEXICON V.stehen
  stehen+Verb:stehen		vflex/PresReg;
  stehen+Verb:stand		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stehen+Verb:ständ		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  stehen+Verb:stünd		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  stehen+Verb:standen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.stehlen
  stehlen+Verb:stehlen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  stehlen+Verb:stiehl		vflex/Pres2;
  stehlen+Verb:stiehl		vform/ImpSg;
  stehlen+Verb:stahl		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stehlen+Verb:stähl		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  stehlen+Verb:stöhl		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  stehlen+Verb:stohlen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.steigen
  steigen+Verb:steigen		vflex/PresReg;
  steigen+Verb:stieg		vflex/PastStr;
  steigen+Verb:stiegen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.sterben
  sterben+Verb:sterben		vflex/PresIrreg;
  sterben+Verb:stirb		vflex/Pres2;
  sterben+Verb:stirb		vform/ImpSg;
  sterben+Verb:starb		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sterben+Verb:stürb		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sterben+Verb:storben		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.stieben
  stieben+Verb			V_reg ;
  stieben+Verb:stob		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stieben+Verb:stöb		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  stieben+Verb:stoben		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.stinken
  stinken+Verb:stinken		vflex/PresReg;
  stinken+Verb:stank		vflex/PastIndStr;
  stinken+Verb:stänk		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  stinken+Verb:stunken		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.stoßen
  stoßen+Verb:stoßen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  stoßen+Verb:stoß		vflex/ImpSg;
  stoßen+Verb:stöß		vflex/Pres2;
  stoßen+Verb:stieß		vflex/PastStr;
  stoßen+Verb:stoßen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.streichen
  streichen+Verb:streichen	vflex/PresReg;
  streichen+Verb:strich		vflex/PastStr;
  streichen+Verb:strichen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.streiten
  streiten+Verb:streiten	vflex/PresReg;
  streiten+Verb:stritt		vflex/PastStr;
  streiten+Verb:stritten	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.tragen
  tragen+Verb:tragen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  tragen+Verb:trag		vflex/ImpSg;
  tragen+Verb:träg		vflex/Pres2;
  tragen+Verb:trug		vflex/PastIndStr;
  tragen+Verb:trüg		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  tragen+Verb:tragen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.treffen
  treffen+Verb:treffen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  treffen+Verb:triff		vflex/Pres2;
  treffen+Verb:triff		vform/ImpSg;
  treffen+Verb:traf		vflex/PastIndStr;
  treffen+Verb:träf		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  treffen+Verb:troffen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.treiben
  treiben+Verb:treiben		vflex/PresReg;
  treiben+Verb:trieb		vflex/PastStr;
  treiben+Verb:trieben		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.treten
  treten+Verb:treten		vflex/PresIrreg;
  treten+Verb:tritt		vflex/Pres2;
  treten+Verb:tritt		vform/ImpSg;
  treten+Verb:trat		vflex/PastIndStr;
  treten+Verb:trät		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  treten+Verb:treten		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.triefen
  triefen+Verb:triefen		vflex/PresReg;
  triefen+Verb:troff		vflex/PastIndStr;
  triefen+Verb:tröff		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  triefen+Verb:troffen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.trinken
  trinken+Verb:trinken		vflex/PresReg;
  trinken+Verb:trank		vflex/PastIndStr;
  trinken+Verb:tränk		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  trinken+Verb:trunken		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.trügen
  trügen+Verb:trügen		vflex/PresReg;
  trügen+Verb:trog		vflex/PastIndStr;
  trügen+Verb:trög		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  trügen+Verb:trogen		vform/PPast;
